District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.68

Cancellation of certificate; waiver of filing proof.

The Mayor shall upon request consent to the immediate cancellation of any certificate of insurance, or the Mayor shall waive the requirements of filing proof, in any of the following events:

(1)

In the event of the death of the person on whose behalf such proof was filed or the permanent incapacity of such person to operate a motor vehicle; or

(2)

In the event the person who has given proof surrenders his license and registration to the Mayor.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 137, ch. 222, § 68
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(c)(5), 29 DCR 3491

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1301.82.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-468.
1973 Ed., § 40-484.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.